District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2112

Real property or tangible personal property.

Repealed.

Nov. 7, 1941, 55 Stat. 761, ch. 469, § 4
Reorg. Plan No. 1 (1953), 67 Stat. 631, 18 F.R. 2053, § 5
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(j)

History

1981 Ed., § 32-612.
1973 Ed., § 32-411.

Prior Codifications

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.

Effective Dates